Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Governor shall facilitate the organization and  holding of one or more
mediation sessions between representatives of the forest industry  and representatives of
environmental interests in accordance with  the Memorandum of Understanding announced
by the Governor on February 10, 2020. The Governor shall limit participation  in the medi-
ation sessions to not  more than 12 representatives, but may not limit such third party as-
sistance as the representatives may require.
(2) The purpose of the mediation sessions shall be to  develop an approach to evaluate and
jointly recommend  substantive and procedural changes to Oregon Forest Practices Act laws
and regulations to advance the attainment of federal regulatory assurances for aquatic and
riparian-dependent species.
(3) The Governor shall organize the mediation sessions with the goal of fulfilling  the
purpose described in subsection (2) of this section no later  than 18 months after the effective
date of this 2020 special session Act.
(4) Except as provided in ORS 36.220 (1) to (4), mediation sessions described in this sec-
tion are not subject to ORS 36.220 to 36.238 or 192.610 to 192.690.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2020 special session Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 3. The President of the Senate and the Speaker of  the House of Represen-
tatives shall arrange for legislative committees related  to natural resources to hold a joint
informational hearing during the 2021 regular session of  the Eighty-first Legislative Assem-
bly regarding the mediation sessions described in section  1 of this 2020 special session Act.
The committees shall, at a minimum, invite the Governor to submit testimony  or documents
at the joint informational hearing regarding the past and expected schedule  and structure
for the  mediation process and such other information concerning the mediation sessions as
the Governor deems reasonable and prudent to disclose.
SECTION 4. As used in sections 4 to 11 of this 2020 special session Act:
(1) “Department reporting system” means  a forest activity electronic reporting and no-
tice system operated by the State Forestry Department.
(2) “Nearby recipient”  means a person registered under section 5 of this 2020 special
session Act:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1602 (SB 1602-A) Page 1
(a) Whose parcel location information is reconciled  under section 5 (2) of this 2020 special
session Act with a tax lot that is in whole or in part less than one mile from the  edge of a
proposed or scheduled pesticide application by helicopter to forestland; or
(b) Whose water intake  location noted under section 5 (4) of this 2020 special session Act
is less than one mile from the edge of  a proposed or scheduled pesticide application by heli-
copter to forestland.
(3) “Pesticide”:
(a) Except as provided in this subsection, has  the meaning given that term in ORS
634.006.
(b) Does  not include fertilizer. As used in this paragraph, “fertilizer” means any sub-
stance, or any  combination or mixture of substances, that is designed for use primarily as
a source of plant food, for inducing increased plant growth or for producing any physical,
microbial or chemical change in the soil.
(4) “Water use qualifying for a spray buffer” means the use of water:
(a) For watering not more than one-half acre of lawn or noncommercial garden;
(b) By one or more dwelling units for domestic animal consumption ancillary to residen-
tial or related use of a property;
(c) By one or more dwelling units for household purposes or human consumption;
(d) For livestock watering; or
(e) Supplied for community purposes through a municipal water system, a system oper-
ated by a federally recognized Indian tribe or a system operated by a private  corporation.
As used in  this paragraph, “community purposes” includes, but is not limited to, uses de-
scribed in paragraphs (a) to  (d) of this subsection, commercial or industrial use, fire pro-
tection, watering of public parks and street cleaning.
SECTION 5.
(1) A person may register with the State Forestry Department to receive
notices of  proposed or scheduled pesticide applications by helicopter to forestland near the
residence of the person. To obtain registration, the person must provide the department
with:
(a) A description of the parcel where the person resides;
(b) Proof satisfactory to the department that the person resides at the parcel; and
(c) Contact information for the person that, at a minimum, includes:
(A) A mailing address; and
(B) An electronic mail address or telephone number.
(2) Upon the receipt of information under subsection (1) of this section,  the department
shall reconcile the parcel location information with  tax lot information and note the tax lot
in a geospatial layer maintained within a department reporting system.
(3) A  person appropriating surface water for a water use qualifying for a spray buffer
may register with the department to  receive notices of proposed or scheduled pesticide ap-
plications by helicopter to forestland near the water intake used by the  person. To obtain
registration, the person must provide the department with:
(a) The global positioning system coordinates for the water intake;
(b) If the water use qualifying for a spray buffer is subject  to water right requirements,
a permit, certificate, registration, limited license or order of determination for the  water
use;
(c) If the water use qualifying for  a spray buffer is exempt from water right require-
ments, a description  of the spring box or other type of water intake and of the type of water
use;
(d) Unless established in documentation described in paragraph (b)  of this subsection, an
attestation that  the person believes the person has a lawful entitlement to make the water
use qualifying for a spray buffer;
(e) An attestation that the person controls the works at the  point of diversion for the
water use qualifying for a spray buffer; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1602 (SB 1602-A) Page 2
(f) Contact information for the person that, at a minimum, includes:
(A) A mailing address; and
(B) An electronic mail address or telephone number.
(4) Upon the receipt of information under subsection (3) of this section,  the department
shall note the location of the water intake in a  geospatial layer maintained within a depart-
ment reporting system.
SECTION 6.
(1) To  the extent of any conflict between this section and ORS 527.610 to
527.770, the provisions of this section prevail.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 527.670, an operator, timber  owner or landowner proposing to
conduct a pesticide application by helicopter to  forestland shall send the State Forestry De-
partment notice of the proposed pesticide application that includes the following:
(a) Identification of  the pesticides likely to be used. The notice may not identify any
pesticides that are not likely to be used.
(b) Identification of the forestland units to receive pesticide application.
(c) Identification of a 90-day period within which the pesticide application is to occur.
(d) Contact information for the  operator, timber owner or landowner providing the notice
that, at a minimum, includes a mail address, electronic mail address and telephone number.
(e) Any information required by State Board of Forestry rules.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, if  the department reporting sys-
tem indicates that the location of the proposed pesticide application  has one or more nearby
recipients, the beginning of the 90-day period identified  in the notice under subsection (2)(c)
of this section must be 30 or more days after the date the notice is  provided to the depart-
ment.
(4) If a pesticide application is not completed during the 90-day period identified  in a no-
tice, the  operator, timber owner or landowner must send a new notice before commencing
or completing the  pesticide application. Notwithstanding ORS 527.670, if the new notice is
sent in the same calendar year as the original notice,  the 90-day period identified in the new
notice must be seven or more days after the date the new notice is provided to  the depart-
ment.
SECTION 7.
(1) Upon receipt of  a notice under section 6 (2) of this 2020 special session
Act, a State Forestry Department reporting system shall provide the operator,  timber owner
or landowner that provided the notice with a list of, and contact information for, any nearby
recipients for the proposed pesticide application.
(2) Two weeks after receiving a notice under section 6 (2) of  this 2020 special session Act,
and on the date of receipt of any new notice under section 6 (4) of this 2020 special session
Act, the department shall send notice of the proposed pesticide application  to the electronic
mail address or telephone number of each nearby recipient for the  application. The notice
sent by the department must include, but need not be limited to, the  location and nature of
the proposed pesticide application and the 90-day period within which the pesticide  applica-
tion may occur, and the mailing address, electronic mail address and  telephone number
supplied as contact information by the operator,  timber owner or landowner that provided
notice of the proposed pesticide application under section 6 of this 2020 special session Act.
SECTION 8.
(1) An operator, timber owner  or landowner that sends notice under section
6 of this 2020 special session Act of a  proposed pesticide application by helicopter to
forestland shall notify the State Forestry Department prior to the  pesticide application by
helicopter being made. A notice under this section must:
(a) Be made by electronic communication to a department reporting system;
(b) Be sent to  the department no later than 7 p.m. on the day preceding the pesticide
application;
(c) Specify the day following the notice as a day for pesticide application by helicopter;
(d) Identify the forestland units to receive pesticide application on the specified day;  and
(e) Contain any additional information required by State Board of Forestry rules.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1602 (SB 1602-A) Page 3
(2) The sending of a notice under subsection (1) of this section does not limit the  number
of days on which a pesticide application by helicopter may be made. However, a separate
notice is required for each day that a pesticide application by helicopter is to be made. The
sending of a notice under subsection  (1) of this section does not require that a pesticide ap-
plication identified in the notice be conducted.
(3) Upon receipt of a notice under this section, the department shall send  the schedule
information for the pesticide  application and forestland unit identification to the electronic
mail address or telephone number of each  nearby recipient to which the department sent
notice of the proposed pesticide application under section 7 of this 2020 special session Act.
SECTION 9.
(1) If a forestland unit identified in a notice sent under section 8 of this 2020
special session Act receives an incomplete pesticide application on  the date specified in the
notice, the  operator, timber owner or landowner shall send a notice of incompletion to a
State Forestry Department reporting system no later than 24 hours  after the end of the date
specified for the application in the notice. The notice of incompletion shall consist of desig-
nating the forestland units to  which an incomplete pesticide application by helicopter was
made. Entry of a notice of incompletion  does not affect the requirement to send notice under
section 8 of this 2020 special session Act before completing the pesticide application.
(2) An operator, timber owner or landowner that sends a  notice under section 8 of this
2020 special session  Act shall send a completion verification to a department reporting sys-
tem no later than 24 hours after the completion of the pesticide application. The  completion
verification shall consist of designating the forestland units to which the pesticide application
by helicopter was made.
(3) The department shall make an electronic listing of  the forestland units that were
identified in the notice under section 8 of this 2020 special session Act available to the op-
erator, timber  owner or landowner in a format that allows the operator, timber owner or
landowner to electronically designate:
(a) Forestland units from the list that have received an incomplete pesticide  application,
when sending a notice of incompletion; and
(b) Forestland units  from the list on which pesticide application is complete, when send-
ing a completion verification.
SECTION 10.
(1) As used in this section, “spray season” means a period that:
(a) Begins on January 1 and ends on June 30 in the same calendar year; or
(b) Begins on July 1 and ends on December 31 in the same calendar year.
(2) If an operator, timber owner or landowner fails  to timely send a notice under section
8 of this 2020 special session Act or timely send  a notice of incompletion or completion ver-
ification under section 9 of this 2020 special session Act for one or  more forestland units,
or any combination of such failures on the same day:
(a) For the first  day during a spray season on which one or more failures occur, the
State Forestry Department shall issue the landowner a warning.
(b) For the second day during a single spray season on which one or more failures  occur,
the department shall assess the landowner a civil penalty of $1,000.
(c) For a third day or any subsequent day during a  single spray season on which one or
more failures occur, the  department shall assess the landowner a civil penalty of $5,000 per
day.
SECTION 11.
(1) If the State Forestry Department receives a notice under section  8 of
this 2020 special session Act, at the beginning of the 90-day period identified in  the notice,
the department shall designate the  forestland units identified in the notice as being in
available status. Except as provided  in subsection (2) of this section, the department shall
terminate the available status of a forestland unit after 90 days.
(2) Upon receiving a notice under section 8 of this  2020 special session Act specifying a
date on which a pesticide application by helicopter is to be  made, the department shall
change the designation of any forestland unit identified in the notice to pending status.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1602 (SB 1602-A) Page 4
(3) Upon receiving a notice of incompletion under  section 9 of this 2020 special session
Act, the department shall change  the designation of any forestland unit identified in the
notice to incomplete status.
(4) Upon receiving a completion verification under section 9 of this 2020  special session
Act, the department shall change  the designation of any forestland unit identified in the
completion verification to completed status.
(5) The department  shall change the designation of a forestland unit from pending status
if, at 11:59 p.m. on the day following  the pesticide application date specified for the forestland
unit in a notice under section 8 of this  2020 special session Act, the department has not re-
ceived a notice of incompletion  or completion verification for the forestland unit. Subject
to subsection (1) of this section,  the department shall return a forestland unit described in
this subsection from pending status to available status.
SECTION 12. (1) As used in this  section, “department reporting system” has the meaning
given that term in section 4 of this 2020 special session Act.
(2) Sections 4 to 11 of this 2020 special session Act  apply to pesticide applications occur-
ring on or after:
(a) July 1, 2021; or
(b) If the  State Chief Information Officer gives public notice prior to July 1, 2021, that
the State Forestry Department reporting system  lacks the required capacity for the carrying
out of sections 4 to 11 of this 2020 special session Act, the earlier of:
(A) July 1, 2022; or
(B) The date on which the State Chief Information  Officer gives public notice that the
department reporting system has the required capacity.
SECTION 13.
(1) As used in this  section, “department reporting system” has the meaning
given that term in section 4 of this 2020 special session Act.
(2) The State Forestry Department shall develop a system  to allow nondepartment mes-
sages to nearby recipients described in section  7 (1) of this 2020 special session Act, notices
under section  8 of this 2020 special session Act and notices of incompletion or completion
verifications under section 9 of this  2020 special session Act to be sent electronically using
mobile telephone equipment to access a department reporting system. The department shall
make the access system  compatible with, at a minimum, the two most commonly used types
of mobile telephone operating systems.
SECTION 14. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Daily  spray records” means records required of a pesticide operator under ORS
634.146.
(b) “Geographic information system  data” means the electronic location data recorded
during a pesticide application by helicopter.
(c) “Health provider” means a  person holding a license, certificate or permit issued under
Oregon law to provide the diagnosis, treatment or care of disease or injury  in the ordinary
course of business  or practice of a profession, when seeking to provide diagnosis, treatment
or care of a patient in response to a suspected exposure of the patient to pesticide.
(d) “Pesticide operator” has the meaning given that term in ORS 634.006.
(2) The Pesticide Analytical  and Response Center shall accept requests for a pesticide
operator’s daily spray records and geographic information system data concerning a pesticide
application by helicopter to forestland from:
(a) A unit of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111;
(b) A law enforcement agency, as defined in ORS 181A.010; or
(c) A health provider.
(3)(a) The  center shall forward a request received under subsection (2) of this section to
the pesticide operator that is the subject of the request.  A pesticide operator that receives
a request from the center shall send the center the daily spray  records and geographic in-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1602 (SB 1602-A) Page 5
formation system data possessed or accessible  to the pesticide operator concerning pesticide
applications by helicopter to forestland identified in the request.
(b) The pesticide operator shall send the requested daily spray record  information to the
center no later than 24 hours after receiving the request. The pesticide operator shall send
the requested geographic information system data to the center no later than five business
days after receiving the request.
(c) Upon receiving requested information  from a pesticide operator, the center shall
forward the information received to the  requesting unit of state government, law enforce-
ment agency or health provider.
(4) Failure of a pesticide operator to  timely send records or data as required under sub-
section (3) of this section is a violation subject to a fine of $1,000 per request.
(5) Records and data sent or received under this section are not public records for pur-
poses of ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
SECTION 15.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Interfere”:
(A) Means to use  force, violence or action that impedes a pesticide application by heli-
copter to forestland.
(B) Does not mean:
(i) The memorializing of pesticide application activities through photography, videotaping,
audiotaping or other creation of an electronic record by a person on public property or on
private property where the person has a lawful right to be present; or
(ii) Other activities  to the extent that the activities are protected under the First
Amendment to the  United States Constitution or Article I, section 8, of the Oregon Consti-
tution.
(b) “Nearby recipient” has the meaning given that term in section 4 of this 2020 special
session Act.
(2) A person that intentionally interferes with a  pesticide application by helicopter to
forestland commits an unclassified violation punishable by a fine of:
(a) $1,000, if during the five years before the date of the interference the person has not
previously been found to have committed a violation under this section; or
(b) $5,000, if not more than five years before the date of  the interference the person was
found to have committed a violation under this section.
(3) For purposes of this  section, there is a conclusive presumption that interference is
intentional if performed by a nearby recipient  who was sent information under section 8 (3)
of this 2020 special session Act concerning the pesticide application.
SECTION 16.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Department reporting system,” “pesticide” and “water use qualifying  for a spray
buffer,” have the meanings given those terms in section 4 of this 2020 special session Act.
(b) “Flowing water” means surface water  is present at the time of a pesticide application.
(c) “Inhabited dwelling” means a structure or part of a structure used as a home,  resi-
dence or sleeping place by a person maintaining a household or  by two or more persons
maintaining a common household,  but does not include outbuildings, yard areas or other land
associated with the structure.
(d) “School” means the campus of:
(A) A Head Start program;
(B) A public or private institution offering instruction  for all or part of prekindergarten
through grade 12;
(C) The Oregon School for the Deaf;
(D) A regional residential academy operated by the Oregon Youth Authority;
(E) An education service district or community college; or
(F) A public or private college or university.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1602 (SB 1602-A) Page 6
(e) “Sixth-level hydrologic unit” means the cataloging unit level of the 12-digit hydrologic
unit mapping system developed by the Federal Geographic Data Committee.
(f) “Type D stream” means a stream that has domestic use, but does not have fish use.
(g) “Type F stream” means a  stream that has fish use or has both domestic use and fish
use.
(h) “Type N stream” means a stream that does not have domestic use or fish use.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 527.672, a person  may not directly apply pesticide by helicopter
to forestland:
(a) Less than 300 feet from an inhabited  dwelling, unless the landowner is the requester
of the application;
(b) Less than  300 feet from a school, unless the school board or other governing body for
the school is the requester of the application; or
(c) Subject to subsection (4) of  this section, less than 300 feet from a water intake for a
water use qualifying for a spray buffer:
(A) Within the same sixth-level hydrologic unit as a  water source for water use qualify-
ing for a spray buffer that is registered under section 5 of this 2020 special session Act; or
(B) Within the same sixth-level hydrologic unit as  a water source for water use qualify-
ing for a spray buffer that is identified by the State Forestry Department and for which  the
location has been recorded in the department reporting system.
(3) On forestland that is subject to ORS 527.610 to 527.770, a person may not directly
apply pesticide by helicopter near a stream:
(a) That is identified by the department as a Type D  stream or Type F stream, within the
greatest of:
(A) 75 feet;
(B) The required vegetated buffer; or
(C) A riparian management  area existing in State Board of Forestry rules on the effec-
tive date of this 2020 special session Act within which vegetation retention and  special
management practices are required; or
(b) That is identified by the department as a Type N stream and has flowing water, within
50 feet.
(4) The restrictions in subsection (2)(c) of this section are contingent upon the water
intake location being recorded in the department reporting system.
SECTION 17.
Section 16 of this 2020 special session Act applies  to pesticide applications
made on or after January 1, 2021.
SECTION 18. The State Board of Forestry shall adopt rules to make  2017 board rules
regarding salmon, steelhead and bull trout applicable for the Siskiyou Georegion.
SECTION 19. The State Board of Forestry shall make the rules adopted by the board
under section 18 of this 2020 special session Act effective on January 1, 2021.
SECTION 20. (1) As used in this section, “department reporting system” and “water use
qualifying for a spray buffer” have the meanings  given those terms in section 4 of this 2020
special session Act.
(2) The State  Forestry Department shall record in the department reporting system any
points of diversion inventoried by the Water Resources Department that are:
(a) For a water use qualifying for a spray buffer; and
(b) Mapped with sufficient precision to allow the  State Forestry Department to imple-
ment buffers under section 16 (2)(c) of this 2020 special session Act.
(3) The State Forestry Department  shall periodically review Water Resources Depart-
ment inventory information for points of diversion and update State Forestry Department
reporting system information as necessary to comply with subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 20a.
The State Forestry Department shall begin recording  inventoried points
of diversion in the department reporting system as required by section 20 of this 2020  special
Enrolled Senate Bill 1602 (SB 1602-A) Page 7
session Act no later than 60 days after  the operative date of section 20 of this 2020 special
session Act.
SECTION 20b. (1) As used in this section, “department reporting system”  and “water use
qualifying for a spray buffer” have the meanings given those  terms in section 4 of this 2020
special session Act.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the State Forestry  Department
and the Water Resources Department shall, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245,  submit
a report to the Legislative Assembly during the 2022 regular session:
(a) Stating the number of points of diversion that have been recorded in the State
Forestry Department reporting system under section 20 of this 2020 special session Act;
(b) Estimating  the extent to which points of diversion for water use qualifying for a spray
buffer remain to be inventoried; and
(c) Estimating the resources required for the  Water Resources Department to identify
points of  diversion, whether already inventoried or remaining to be inventoried, with suffi-
cient precision to allow the State Forestry Department to identify those points of  diversion
qualifying for a spray buffer and implement  buffers under section 16 (2)(c) of this 2020 special
session Act.
(3) If section 20 of this 2020  special session Act becomes operative on or after the date
that the 2022 regular session of the Legislative Assembly adjourns sine  die, the departments
shall submit the report required by  this section to the Legislative Assembly during the 2023
regular session.
SECTION 21. Section 20 of this 2020 special session Act becomes operative  on the date
sections 4 to 11 of this  2020 special session Act become applicable to pesticide applications
as determined under section 12 of this 2020 special session Act.
SECTION 22. This 2020 special session Act being necessary for  the immediate preserva-
tion of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2020
special session Act takes effect on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 26, 2020
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2020
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1602 (SB 1602-A) Page 8